Morphological-Analysis/Finnish-05/finnish-v2.twol
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ä ö å
a:ä o:ö u:y

I:i  I:e
t:0

;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Sets 

Vowel = a o u   ä ö y   e i  I V ;

VowelBack = a o u  ;

VowelFront = ä ö y ;

VowelNeut = e i ;

Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! VOWEL HARMONY
!! explanation of fronting in /Finnish-02/
!! version 3: simplify fronting-2b: simpler version of the => rule
"Vowel FRONTING # 3b"
VowelBack:VowelFront /<=  :VowelBack  :* _  ; !! 3b

!! in the <= rule fronting-2a: flip the tapes of the CVnonb:@ symbol 
"Vowel FRONTING # 3a"
VowelBack:VowelFront <=  # [ :VowelFront | :VowelNeut | :Cons ]+ %>:  :* _  ; !! 3a

!! ensure that a morpheme boundary has been encountered: 
!! forbid back-to-front changes in the STEM!
"Vowel FRONTING # 1c"
VowelBack:VowelFront  => %>:  :* _  ; !! 1c


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
"VOWEL DOUBLING"
V:Vx  <=>  :Vy  %>:  _  ;
      where Vx in ( a e i o u y ä ö )
            Vy in ( a e i o u y ä ö )
      matched ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
"Native -i nouns"
I:i  <=>  _  %>:*  # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! VERSION 1
!! "Consonant gradation tt --> t: Version 1"
!! t:0  <=>  t:t  _  Vowel %>: Cons  [ Cons | # ] ;  !! tt-t gradation version 1

"Gradation tt->t: 2a"     t:0 <=   t:t  _  Vowel %>: Cons  [ Cons | # ] ;
!! "Gradation tt->t: 2b"  t:0  =>  t:t  _  Vowel %>: Cons  [ Cons | # ] ;

"Gradation tt->t: 2c"     t:0 /<=       _ t: ; 
                                       
"Gradation tt->t: 2d"     t:t <=        _ Vowel: (%>:)  #  ;
                                        _ Vowel: (%>:)  Vowel:  ;
                                        _ Vowel: (%>:)  Cons:  Vowel:  ;
                                     s: _  ;
                                   
"Gradation tt->t: 2e"     t:0  =>  t _ ;  !! delete only SECOND t
